Maine, session 132, LD1151.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to enact measures to address issues relating to a MaineCare recipient
losing MaineCare coverage if the recipient's income increases above the income levels
established for MaineCare eligibility.
Page 1 - 132LR2145(01)